Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 201981-5,174
Boiler explosion; investigation; report.

The state boiler inspector shall investigate and report to the State Fire Marshal the cause of any boiler explosion that may occur in the state, the loss of life, the injuries sustained, the estimated loss of property, if any, and such other data as may be of benefit in preventing other similar explosions.

Laws 1943, c. 112, § 4(2), p. 394;

R.S.1943, § 48-708;

R.S.1943, (1984), § 48-708;

Laws 1987, LB 462, § 10;

R.S.1943, (2010), § 48-728;

Laws 2019, LB301, § 10.